Tennessee, session 114, HB1075.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 3-1-102(g), is amended by adding
the following language at the end of the subsection:
The comptroller of the treasury shall report to the general assembly which counties, if
any, redrew precinct lines pursuant to this subsection (g).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1075
000886
- 1 -